Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.650

Repeaters.

(1) Any person who intentionally votes or attempts to vote in this state more than once at any election, or who intentionally votes or attempts to vote in both this state and another state at any election, is guilty of a class C felony.

(2) Any person who recklessly or negligently violates this section commits a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120.

[ 2005 c 243 s 24; 2003 c 111 s 2131. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 13; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.210; prior: 1911 c 89 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 903; 1873 p 204 s 102; 1865 p 51 s 5; 1854 p 93 s 93; RRS s 5383. Formerly RCW 29.85.210.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.